Tennessee, session 114, SB1129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 14, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) It is an offense for a person, with intent to deprive the owner of a motor
vehicle, to knowingly obtain or exercise control over the motor vehicle without the
owner's effective consent.
(b) It is an offense for a person, who knows that the person does not have the
permission of the owner of a motor vehicle, to exercise control over the motor vehicle..
(c)
(1) A violation of subsection (a) is punished as theft under § 39-14-105,
after determining value under § 39-11-106.
(2) A violation of subsection (b) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 14, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) It is an offense for a person to possess a firearm that the person knows or
reasonably should know has been stolen.
(b) The affirmative defenses in § 39-14-107 may be asserted in a prosecution for
a violation of subsection (a).
(c) A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1129
003139
- 1 -